Utah statutes.
17C-1-602.   Amending the agency annual budget.

(1)  An agency board may by resolution amend an annual agency budget.

(2)  An amendment of the annual agency budget that would increase the total expenditures may be made only after public hearing by notice published as required for initial adoption of the annual budget.

(3)  An agency may not make expenditures in excess of the total expenditures established in the annual budget as it is adopted or amended.

